District of Columbia statutes.
40-403

Lien for rent, labor, or other charges.

(a)

The operator shall have a lien on all personal property stored within each leased space for rent, labor, or other charges, and for expenses reasonably incurred in its sale, as provided in this chapter.

(b)

The rental agreement shall contain a statement, in bold type, advising the occupant:

(1)

Of the existence of the lien; and

(2)

That property stored in the leased space may be sold to satisfy the lien if the occupant is in default.

History

Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-64, § 4, 50 DCR 9303